Massachusetts, session 194th, H2427.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. There shall be a task force created to develop a statutory and regulatory 
framework to identify, monitor, and remediate indoor air pollution and indoor mold 
contamination in schools, long term care facilities, correctional facilities, early childhood 
education facilities, public housing, and privately-owned residential buildings. The task force 
shall also identify and make recommendations for funding sources for implementation of its 
recommendations.  
Said task force shall be comprised of the commissioner of public health or a designee, 
who shall serve as chair, the commissioner of environmental protection or a designee; the 
secretary of housing and livable communities or a designee; the attorney general or a designee; 
and 7 additional members to be appointed by the Governor: a representative of a community-
based environmental justice organization; an academic expert on environmental health; a 
representative of the Massachusetts Association of Health Boards; an individual with experience 

of 2 13 in community clinical health care; an individual with experience in the state’s shelter housing 
system; an individual with experience in long-term senior care; and an individual with 
experience in public school administration. 
Said task force shall convene its first meeting within 30 days of the passage of this Act. 
Said task force shall submit a final report with its recommendations to the House and Senate 
Committees on Public Health, the House and Senate Committees on Ways and Means, the 
executive office of health and human services, the executive office of energy and environmental 
affairs, the Attorney General, and the state Environmental Justice Council within one year of the 
passage of this Act. Not less than 30 days prior to the release of said final report, the task force 
shall release draft recommendations for public review and comment. 
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department 
of public health, in consultation with the department of environmental protection, shall 
promulgate regulations for conducting indoor air quality assessments monitoring exposure to 
ultrafine particulate matter and black carbon particulate matter concentrations present in the 
indoor air of existing and proposed buildings, based on the best available science about the 
health risks associated with ultrafine particulate matter and black carbon. The regulations shall 
include, but not be limited to, establishing standard procedures and public reporting mechanisms 
for conducting air dispersion modeling, managing air pollution, monitoring ultrafine particulate 
matter, and estimating exposure. 
Said regulations shall be promulgated no later than December 31, 2026.